Hawaii statutes.
§324-23 Legal proceedings; information
excluded from. Except as otherwise provided, findings, conclusions, or
summaries resulting from medical studies within the scope of this part shall
not be used or made available in any legal proceeding. Any information
provided to any researcher or study committee shall not be used or made
available in any legal proceeding unless it is unobtainable from the original
source. In such event, the judicial officer shall in chambers inspect the
findings, conclusions, or summaries and make available factual information
contained therein. [L 1973, c 25, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next